North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44A. Statutory Liens and Charges.
Article 5. Aircraft Labor and Storage Liens.

§ 44A-50.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, the following terms mean:

Aircraft. — As the term is defined in G.S. 63-1(3), or any engine, part, component, or accessory, whether affixed to or separate from the aircraft.

Lienor. — A person entitled to a lien under this Article.

Owner. — As the term is defined in

G.S. 44A-1(3)

for an aircraft, or any person authorized by an owner, as defined in

G.S. 44A-1(3)

, to perform, contract, or arrange for the provision of labor, skill, materials, or storage with respect to any aircraft.

Person. — Any individual, corporation, association, partnership, whether limited or general, limited liability company, or other entity.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-55.
Persons entitled to a lien on an aircraft.

Any person who has expended labor, skill, or materials on an aircraft or has furnished storage for an aircraft at the request of its owner has a perfected lien on the aircraft beginning on the date the expenditure of labor, skill, or materials or the storage commenced, for the contract price for the expenditure of labor, skill, or materials or for the storage, or, in the absence of a contract price, for the reasonable worth of the expenditure of labor, skill, or materials, or of the storage. The lien under this section survives even if the possession of the aircraft is surrendered by the lienor.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-60.
Notice of lien on an aircraft.

The lien under

G.S. 44A-55

expires 120 days after the date the lienor voluntarily surrenders possession of the aircraft, unless the lienor, prior to the expiration of the 120-day period, files a notice of lien in the office of the clerk of court of the county in which the labor, skill, or materials were expended on the aircraft, or the storage was furnished for the aircraft.

The notice of lien shall state all of the following:

The name of the lienor.

The name of the registered owner of the aircraft, if known.

The name of the person with whom the lienor entered into a contract for labor, skill, or materials on the aircraft, or storage of the aircraft.

A description of the aircraft sufficient for identification.

The amount for which the lien is claimed.

The dates upon which the expenditure of labor, skill, materials, or storage was commenced and completed, or, if not completed, the date through which the claimed amount is calculated.

The notice of lien shall be sworn to or affirmed, and subscribed by the lienor, or by someone on the lienor’s behalf having personal knowledge of the facts.

The notice of lien shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

‘‘NOTICE OF LIEN ON AIRCRAFT [Lienor] Lienor, v. [Owner] Owner Notice is hereby given that [Lienor](name) claims a lien upon [aircraft](describe the aircraft) for labor, skill, or materials expended on, and for storage furnished for, this aircraft; that the name of the registered owner or reputed owner, if the aircraft is not registered or the registered owner is not known, is [Owner](name), that the labor, skill, or materials were expended on the aircraft commencing the day of , and storage was furnished on the aircraft commencing the day of, and the labor, skill, materials, and storage furnished by the lienor [was completed] [is ongoing] on the day of ; that 120 days have not elapsed since the aircraft was released by the lienor; that the amount the lienor demands for the labor, skill, materials, and storage furnished, as of the date hereof is $ (amount); that no part thereof has been paid except $ (amount); and that there is now due and remaining unpaid, after deducting all credits and offsets, the sum of $ (amount), in which amount [Lienor](name) claims a lien upon the aircraft. (Signed) (Lienor) Address of Lienor State of North Carolina County of Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this day by [name of principal]. Date: [Official Signature of Nottary] [Notary’s printed or typed name], Notary Public Notary Public My Commission Expires: [Date] [Official Seal]’’ [Official Seal]’’

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-65.
Notice of lien filed by the clerk of court.

Upon presentation of a notice of lien pursuant to this Article, the clerk of court shall file the notice of lien and shall index the notice of lien in a record maintained by the clerk for that purpose.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-70.
Priority of a lien on an aircraft.

The lien under this Article shall have priority over perfected and unperfected security interests.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-75.
Termination of a lien on an aircraft.

Termination by Payment of Amount Owed. — Any lien under this Article shall be terminated upon receipt by the lienor of the full amount owed for the labor, skill, or materials on the aircraft, and for storage of the aircraft, which amount shall not be limited to any amount shown on the notice of lien filed under

G.S. 44A-60

, if a notice of lien has been filed by the lienor. Upon receipt of the amount owed, the lienor or the lienor’s agent shall release the aircraft to the owner, if the aircraft is in the possession of the lienor, and shall, within 20 days following a request in writing by the aircraft owner, file with the clerk of court a notice of satisfaction of lien, if a notice of lien has been filed by the lienor. A notice of satisfaction of lien shall state that the amount owed for the lienor’s expenditure of labor, skill, or materials on the aircraft, and for the storage of the aircraft, has been paid and the lien against the aircraft has been terminated. The notice of satisfaction of lien shall be sworn to or affirmed, and subscribed by the lienor or by someone on the lienor’s behalf having personal knowledge of the facts. Upon the filing of a notice of satisfaction of lien, the clerk of court shall make an entry of acknowledgment of satisfaction in the index.

Termination by Deposit of Surety Bond. — Any lien under this Article shall be terminated by the clerk of court whenever a surety bond in a sum equal to one and one-fourth times the amount of the lien claimed against the aircraft and conditioned upon the payment of the amount finally determined to be due in satisfaction of the lien is deposited with the clerk of court. When a deposit that satisfies this subsection is made, the lienor or the lienor’s agent shall release the aircraft to the owner, if the aircraft is in the possession of the lienor.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1; 2013-17, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-17, s. 1, redesignated the formerly undesignated paragraph as present subsection (a); added “Termination by Payment of Amount Owed” in the subsection (a) heading; and added subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 44A-80.
Fees.

The clerk of court shall collect fees for filing, copying, and certifying any document under this Article as set forth in

G.S. 7A-308

.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-85.
Enforcement of lien by sale.

A lien filed under this Article may be enforced in accordance with

G.S. 44A-4

, and the proceeds of sale shall be applied as set forth in

G.S. 44A-5

, except that the three-day time period set forth in

G.S. 44A-4

(a) for the lienor to file a contrary statement of the amount of the lien at the time of the filing of a complaint by the owner shall be extended to 30 days. An owner may seek immediate possession of an aircraft in accordance with G.S. 44A-4.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.

§ 44A-90.
Title of purchaser.

A purchaser for value at a properly conducted sale under this Article, and a purchaser for value without constructive notice of a defect in the sale, whether or not the purchaser is the lienor or an agent of the lienor, acquires title to the property free of any interests over which the lienor was entitled to priority.

Upon the completion of a sale conducted under this Article, the lienor or a person acting on behalf of the lienor, who conducted the sale shall furnish to the purchaser for value a bill of sale for the aircraft signed by the person who conducted the sale that includes a statement that the sale was conducted in accordance with this Article.

History.

2006-222, s. 1.1.